Vermont, session 2025-2026, H307.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. VERMONT COMMUNITY RADIO GRANT PROGRAM
(a) Findings. The General Assembly finds that:
(1) Vermont’s seven active community radio stations currently serve
over 200,000 Vermonters, many in rural and underserved areas.
(2) Community radio stations have consistently provided critical
information during emergencies, including Tropical Storm Irene, recent severe
flooding, and other natural disasters.
VT LEG #380921 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.307
2025 Page 2 of 4
(3) These stations operate with small budgets, primarily relying on
volunteer staff and listener donations, and are ineligible for federal funding
through the Corporation for Public Broadcasting due to their size.
(4) Upcoming FCC-approved stations in Bristol, Richmond-Underhill-
Jericho, and Ludlow will expand coverage to nearly all Vermont counties,
increasing statewide accessibility to vital community radio services.
(5) Investment in these stations strengthens Vermont’s public safety
network and promotes civic engagement by providing local, hyper-focused
content that commercial and statewide media cannot replicate.
(b) Intent. The intent of this section is to ensure Vermont’s community
radio stations remain resilient and prepared to serve as lifelines during
emergencies while fostering local engagement and preserving Vermont’s
unique community fabric.
(c) Grant program.
(1) The Vermont Community Radio Grant Program is established to
provide one-time funding to community radio stations for the purpose of:
(A) upgrading equipment and infrastructure necessary for reliable
emergency broadcasting;
(B) procuring and installing backup generators; and
(C) enhancing operational sustainability through software
improvements and technical training.
VT LEG #380921 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.307
2025 Page 3 of 4
(2) The Program shall be administered by the Commissioner of Public
Safety or designee in collaboration with the Vermont Association of
Broadcasters.
(3) Grants shall be allocated as follows:
(A) Up to $25,000.00 per station for seven active community radio
stations.
(B) Up to $10,000.00 per station for three upcoming stations
currently under construction.
(4) To be eligible for a grant under the Program, an applicant shall:
(A) be a nonprofit, noncommercial community radio station licensed
in Vermont;
(B) demonstrate a history of providing emergency broadcasting
services or show the capacity to provide such services upon funding; and
(C) submit a detailed implementation plan for the proposed use of
grant funding.
(d) Report. On or before June 30, 2026, a community radio station that
receives a grant under the Program shall provide to the Commissioner of
Public Safety a report detailing the:
(1) use of grant funds, including itemized expenses;
(2) improvements achieved in emergency readiness and operational
capacity; and
VT LEG #380921 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.307
2025 Page 4 of 4
(3) impact on community service and engagement.
Sec. 2. APPROPRIATION
In fiscal year 2026, the sum of $205,000.00 is appropriated from the
General Fund to the Department of Public Safety for the purpose of funding
the Vermont Community Radio Grant Program. Any unexpended funds shall
revert to the General Fund on or before July 1, 2026.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #380921 v.1